Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF EDEN PRAIRIE; TAX INCREMENT FINANCING AUTHORITY; EDEN PRAIRIE CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin Pursuant to the special rules established in subdivision 2, the economic development authority of the city of Eden Prairie or the city of Eden Prairie may establish not more than two redevelopment districts located within the area of the city of Eden Prairie consisting of parcels, together with adjacent roads and rights-of-way, within the area surrounded by Flying Cloud Drive, West 78th Street, and Prairie Center Drive. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special rules. new text end new text begin If the city or authority establishes a tax increment financing district under this section, the following special rules apply: new text end new text begin (1) the districts are deemed to meet the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.174, subdivision 10; and new text end new text begin (2) Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4j, does not apply to the district. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The authority to approve a tax increment financing plan to establish a tax increment financing district under this section expires December 31, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Eden Prairie and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end